el: Απόκριση γιο-γιο: Μετατρεπόμενο (με απόκριση/χωρίς απόκριση); Με απόκριση; Χωρίς απόκριση; Άλλο
vi: Khả năng phản hồi của con lắc: Có thể chuyển đổi (đáp ứng/không đáp ứng); Đáp ứng; Không đáp ứng; Khác
nb: Jojo-respons: Konverterbar (responsiv / ikke-responsiv); Responsiv; Ikke-responsiv; Annet
fi: Jojon herkkyys: Muunnettava (reagoiva/ei-reagoiva); Reagoiva; Ei-reagoiva; Muu
pl: Responsywność jojo: Konwertowalne (responsywne/nieresponsywne); Responsywne; Nieresponsywne; Inne
da: Respons for yo-yo: Konvertibel (responsiv/uresponsiv); Responsiv; Uresponsiv; Andet
de: Reaktionsverhalten des Jojos: Wandelbar (responsiv/nicht responsiv); Responsiv; Nicht responsiv; Sonstige
hu: Jojó válaszkészsége: Átalakítható (reszponzív/nem reszponzív); Reszponzív; Nem reszponzív; Egyéb
nl: Responsiviteit van de jojo: Converteerbaar (responsief/non-responsief); Responsief; Non-responsief; Overig
es: Capacidad de respuesta del yo-yo: Convertible (con respuesta/sin respuesta); Con respuesta; Sin respuesta; Otro
zh-TW: 溜溜球回彈性: 可轉換 (回應式/無回應式); 回應式; 無回應式; 其他
fr: Réactivité du yo-yo: Convertible (réactif/non réactif); Réactif; Non réactif; Autre
ja: ヨーヨーのレスポンス性能: コンバーチブル (レスポンシブ/アンレスポンシブ); レスポンシブ; アンレスポンシブ; その他
pt-PT: Resposta do ioiô: Convertível (reativo/não reativo); Reativo; Não reativo; Outro
en: Yo-yo responsiveness: Convertible (responsive/unresponsive); Responsive; Unresponsive; Other
lt-LT: Jojo reakcijos lygis: Konvertuojamas (reaguojantis / nereaguojantis); Reaguojantis; Nereaguojantis; Kita
hr-HR: Jo-jo odziv: Konvertibilan (reaktivan / nereaktivan); Reaktivan; Nereaktivan; Ostalo
pt-BR: Ioiô responsividade: Conversível (responsivo/não responsivo); Responsivo; Não responsivo; Outros
sl-SI: Odzivnost jo-joja: Prilagodljivo (odzivno/neodzivno); Odzivno; Neodzivno; Drugo
th: การตอบสนองแบบโยโย่: ปรับเปลี่ยนได้ (ตอบสนอง/ไม่ตอบสนอง); ตอบสนอง; ไม่ตอบสนอง; อื่นๆ
ru: Отзывчивость йо-йо: Трансформер (с отдачей/без отдачи); С отдачей; Без отдачи; Другое
zh-CN: 溜溜球响应: 可转换（响应式/无响应式）; 响应式; 无响应式; 其他
it: Reattività dello yo-yo: Convertibile (reattivo/non reattivo); Reattivo; Non reattivo; Altro
bg-BG: Реагиране на йо-йо механизма: Конвертируемо (откликващо/неоткликващо); Откликващо; Неоткликващо; Други
ko: 요요 반응성: 전환 가능(응답형/비응답형); 응답형; 비응답형; 기타
cs: Odezva jo-jo: Konvertibilní (responzivní/neresponzivní); Responzivní; Neresponzivní; Jiné
sk-SK: Citlivosť návratu joja: Konvertibilné (responzívne/neresponzívne); Responzívne; Neresponzívne; Iné
tr: Yo-yo tepkiselliği: Dönüştürülebilir (duyarlı/duyarsız); Duyarlı; Duyarsız; Diğer
sv: Jojo-responsivitet: Konverterbar (responsiv/icke-responsiv); Responsiv; Icke-responsiv; Övrigt
ro-RO: Reactivitatea jucăriei yo-yo: Convertibil (reactiv/nereactiv); Reactiv; Nereactiv; Altele